Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5667.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-52-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-52 entitled "Maintenance
of Order on Campus [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
16-52-2. Appointment of campus police.
(a) The board of governors for higher education may appoint one or more persons who may
act as police officers upon the property and highways of state colleges and universities subject to
the control of the board. The campus police officers shall protect the property of each college or
university, suppress nuisances and disturbances and breaches of the peace, and enforce laws and
regulations for the preservation of good order. They shall have the same powers and authority as
that conferred upon municipal police officers, including the power to arrest persons for violations
of state criminal statutes or for violations of city or town ordinances of the city or town in which
the institution is located. They shall not carry firearms unless expressly authorized by the board of
governors. They shall be equipped with ballistic body armor of the same or similar standard worn
by the state police. Additionally, any campus police officer observing the violation of any rule or
regulation of the board adopted pursuant to this chapter, including but not limited to parking and
traffic regulations, may issue a summons in the manner and form set forth in § 31-27-12 or § 31-
41.1-1 returnable to the district court, the police court of the city or town where the violation occurs,
or the traffic tribunal as provided by law.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines and penalties recovered for

violation of rules and regulations made under authority of this section shall be accounted for by the
appropriate authority, which shall forward all fines or penalties for nonmoving traffic violations to
the general treasurer for use by the college or university on whose campus the citation or violation
was issued in accordance with § 16-32-27.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001843
========
LC001843 - Page 2 of 3